California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(f) (1) The caseworker at the Youth Referral Center shall explain the service plan to the minor and the parents and, prior to any referral to services, the minor and
 the parents shall agree to the plan. The minor and the parents shall be informed that the minor’s failure to accept or to cooperate with the service plan may result in the filing of a petition and a finding of wardship under Section 601.

(2) With the cooperation of the collaborative group described in subdivision (b), the Youth Referral Center shall review youth and family services offered within its local service area and shall identify providers, programs, and services that are available for referral of minors and parents under this section. Providers to which minors and parents may be referred under this section may be public or private agencies or individuals offering counseling, health, educational, parenting, mentoring, community service, skill-building, and other relevant services that are considered likely to resolve the behavioral problems that are referred to the center.

(g) (1) Unless the probation department is directly operating and staffing the Youth Referral Center, the probation department shall designate one or more probation officers to serve as liaison to a Youth Referral Center for the purpose of facilitating and monitoring compliance with service plans established in individual cases by the center.

(2) If, upon consultation with the minor’s parents and with providers designated in the service plan, the supervising caseworker at the center and the liaison probation officer agree that the minor has willfully, significantly, and repeatedly failed to cooperate with the service plan, the minor shall be referred to the probation department which shall verify the failure and, upon verification, shall file a petition seeking to declare the minor a ward of the juvenile court under subdivision (a) of Section 601. No minor shall be referred to the probation department for the
 filing of a petition under this subdivision until at least 90 days have elapsed after the first attempt to implement the service plan. No minor shall be subject to filing of a petition under this subdivision for a failure to complete the service plan which is due principally to an inability of the minor or the family to pay for services listed in the service plan.

(3) If, within 180 days of the start of the service plan, the minor and the family have substantially completed the service plan and the minor’s behavior problem appears to have been resolved, the center shall notify the probation department that the plan has been successfully completed.

(h) If a petition to declare the minor a ward of the juvenile court under subdivision (a) of Section 601 has been filed by the probation officer under this section, the court shall review the petition and any other facts which the court
 deems appropriate in relation to the minor’s alleged failure to comply with the service plan described in subdivision (e). Based upon this review, the court may continue any hearing on the petition for up to six months so that the minor and the minor’s parents may renew their efforts to comply with the service plan under court supervision. During the period in which the hearing is continued, the court may order that the minor and the parent cooperate with the service plan designed by the Youth Referral Center, or the court may modify the service plan or may impose additional conditions upon the minor or the parents as may be appropriate to encourage resolution of the behavior problems that led to the filing of the petition. The court shall, during the period of continuance, periodically review compliance with the extended service plan through reports from the probation officer or by calling the parties back into court, based upon a review schedule deemed appropriate by the court.

(i) The juvenile court of any county participating in the At-Risk Youth Early Intervention Program shall designate a judicial officer to serve as a liaison to the program in order to participate in the development of the program and to coordinate program operations with the juvenile court. The liaison judicial officer may be designated by the juvenile court as the principal judicial officer assigned to review and hear petitions filed under this section, or if the court does not elect to designate a principal judicial officer to hear these cases, the juvenile court shall take steps to train or familiarize other judicial officers reviewing or hearing these cases as to the operations, procedures, and services of the At-Risk Youth Early Intervention Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 909, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

602.

(a) Except as provided in Section 707, any minor who is between 12 years of age and 17 years of age, inclusive, when he or she violates any law of this state or of the United States or any ordinance of any city or county of this state defining crime other than an ordinance establishing a curfew based solely on age, is within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court, which may adjudge the minor to be a ward of the court.

(b) Any minor who is under 12 years of age when he or she is alleged to have committed
 any of the following offenses is within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court, which may adjudge the minor to be a ward of the court:

(1) Murder.

(2) Rape by force, violence, duress, menace, or fear of immediate and unlawful bodily injury.

(3) Sodomy by force, violence, duress, menace, or fear of immediate and unlawful bodily injury.

(4) Oral copulation by force, violence, duress, menace, or fear of immediate and unlawful bodily injury.

(5) Sexual penetration by force, violence, duress, menace, or fear of immediate and unlawful bodily injury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 1006, Sec. 2.   (SB 439)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Note: This section was amended November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 57.)
-------------------------------------------

602.05.

(a) A minor adjudged to be a ward of the court pursuant to Section 601 or 602 who is subject to an order of probation pursuant to Section 727, with or without supervision of the probation officer, shall not remain on probation for a period that exceeds 12 months from the most recent disposition hearing, except as specified in subdivision (b). Nothing in this section shall preclude the court from holding progress review hearings at any point prior to 12 months from the most recent disposition hearing.

(b) A court may extend the probation period
 after a noticed hearing and upon proof by a preponderance of the evidence that it is in the ward’s and the public’s best interest, consistent with Section 202.

(1) At the noticed hearing, the probation agency shall submit a report to the court detailing the basis for any request to extend probation.

(2) The court shall provide the ward and the prosecuting attorney with the opportunity to present relevant evidence. The court has discretion to receive evidence by testimony, declaration, and other documentary evidence.

(3) In cases in which the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence a basis for extending probation, the court shall state the reasons for the findings orally on the record. The court
 shall also set forth the reasons in an order entered upon the minutes if requested by either party or when the proceedings are not being recorded electronically or reported by a court reporter.

(4) If the court finds good cause to continue the noticed hearing, probation shall continue until completion of the noticed hearing, provided that continuance shall be for only as long as necessary.

(c) If the court extends probation at the noticed hearing, the court shall schedule and hold subsequent noticed hearings for the ward pursuant to subdivision (b) not less frequently than every six months for the remainder of the wardship period.

(d) This section does not preclude termination of a ward’s probation before the end of a twelve-month period. 

(e) Prior to terminating jurisdiction over a youth who is described by subdivision (a) of Section 607.2, the court shall comply with the provisions of Section 607.2.

(f) This section does not apply to any ward whom the court ordered the care, custody, and control of the minor or nonminor to be under the supervision of the probation officer pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 727 for placement except that the requirement to comply with the provisions of Section 607.2 shall not be
 the sole basis for continuing an order imposing terms and conditions of probation, as referenced in subdivision (b) of Section 730. If the court retains jurisdiction pursuant to this subdivision, the ward shall not be subject to a petition pursuant to Section 777 or a violation of probation.

(g) This section does not apply to a ward
 while serving a custodial commitment to a juvenile hall, juvenile home, ranch, camp, or forestry camp pursuant to Section 730.

(h) This section does not apply to any ward who is transferred from a secure youth treatment facility to a less restrictive program pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section
 875 or to any ward who is discharged from a secure youth treatment facility pursuant to a probation discharge hearing described in subdivision (e) of Section 875.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 575, Sec. 2.   (AB 1376)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

602.1.

(a) In order to ensure the safety and well-being of minors who are under 12 years of age and whose behavior would otherwise bring them within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 601 or 602, it is the intent of the Legislature that counties pursue appropriate measures to serve and protect a child only as needed, avoiding any intervention whenever possible, and using the least restrictive alternatives through available school-, health-, and community-based services. It is the intent of the Legislature that counties use existing funding for behavioral health, mental health, or other available existing funding sources to provide the alternative services
 required by this section.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 602, when a minor under 12 years of age comes to the attention of law enforcement because his or her behavior or actions are as described in Section 601 or 602, the response of the county shall be to release the minor to his or her parent, guardian, or caregiver. Counties shall develop a process for determining the least restrictive responses that may be used instead of, or in addition to, the release of the minor to his or her parent, guardian, or caregiver.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2020.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 1006, Sec. 3.   (SB 439)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Section operative January 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

602.3.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law and pursuant to the provisions of this section, the juvenile court shall commit any minor adjudicated to be a ward of the court for the personal use of a firearm in the commission of a violent felony, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 of the Penal Code, to placement in a juvenile hall, ranch, camp, or with the Department of the Youth Authority.

(b) A court may impose a treatment-based alternative placement order on any
 minor subject to this section if the court finds the minor has a mental disorder requiring intensive treatment. Any alternative placement order under this subdivision shall be made on the record, in writing, and in accordance with Article 3 (commencing with Section 6550) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 6.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 602.5 (as added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 996) by Stats. 2001, Ch. 854, Sec. 73.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

602.5.

The juvenile court shall report the complete criminal history of any minor found to be a person adjudged to be a ward of the court under Section 602 because of the commission of any felony offense to the Department of Justice. The Department of Justice shall retain this information and make it available in the same manner as information gathered pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 13100) of Title 3 of Part 4 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added March 7, 2000, by initiative Proposition 21, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

603.

(a) No court shall have jurisdiction to conduct a preliminary examination or to try the case of any person upon an accusatory pleading charging that person with the commission of a public offense or crime when the person was under the age of 18 years at the time of the alleged commission thereof unless the matter has first been submitted to the juvenile court by petition as provided in Article 7 (commencing with Section 650), and the juvenile court has made an order directing that the person be prosecuted under the general law.

(b) This section shall not apply in any case involving a minor against whom a complaint may be filed directly in a court of criminal jurisdiction pursuant to Section 707.01.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 481, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

603.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in a county that adopts the provisions of this section, jurisdiction over the case of a minor alleged to have committed only a violation of the Vehicle Code classified as an infraction or a violation of a local ordinance involving the driving, parking, or operation of a motor vehicle, is with the superior court, except that the court may refer to the juvenile court for adjudication, cases involving a minor who has been adjudicated a ward of the juvenile court, or who has other matters pending in
 the juvenile court.

(b) The cases specified in subdivision (a) shall not be governed by the procedures set forth in the juvenile court law.

(c) Any provisions of juvenile court law requiring that confidentiality be observed as to cases and proceedings, prohibiting or restricting the disclosure of juvenile court records, or restricting attendance by the public at juvenile court proceedings shall not apply. The procedures for bail specified in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1268) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Penal Code shall apply.

(d) The provisions of this section shall apply in a county in which the trial courts make the section applicable as to any matters to be heard and the court has determined that there is available funding for any increased costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 56, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

604.

(a) Whenever a case is before any court upon an accusatory pleading and it is suggested or appears to the judge before whom the person is brought that the person charged was, at the date the offense is alleged to have been committed, under the age of 18 years, the judge shall immediately suspend all proceedings against the person on the charge. The judge shall examine into the age of the person, and if, from the examination, it appears to the judge’s satisfaction that the person was at the date the offense is alleged to have been committed under the age of 18 years, the judge shall immediately certify all of the following to the juvenile court of the county:

(1) That the person (naming the person) is charged with a crime (briefly stating its nature).

(2) That the person appears to have been under the age of 18 years at the date the offense is alleged to have been committed, giving the date of birth of the person when known.

(3) That proceedings have been suspended against the person on the charge by reason of the person’s age, with the date of the suspension.

The judge shall attach a copy of the accusatory pleading to the certification.

(b) When a court certifies a case to the juvenile court pursuant to subdivision (a), it shall be deemed that jeopardy has not attached by reason of the proceedings prior to certification,
 but the court may not resume proceedings in the case, nor may a new proceeding under the general law be commenced in any court with respect to the same matter unless the juvenile court has found that the minor is not a fit subject for consideration under the juvenile court law and has ordered that proceedings under the general law resume or be commenced.

(c) The certification and accusatory pleading shall be promptly transmitted to the clerk of the juvenile court. Upon receipt thereof, the clerk of the juvenile court shall immediately notify the probation officer who shall immediately proceed in accordance with Article 16 (commencing with Section 650).

(d) This section does not apply to any minor who may have a complaint filed directly against them in a court of criminal
 jurisdiction pursuant to Section 707.01.

(e) If the person whose case has been certified to a juvenile court pursuant to this section has their records sealed in juvenile court, the juvenile court shall also order all criminal court records associated with that juvenile record sealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 782, Sec. 6.   (SB 1161)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

605.

Whenever a petition is filed in a juvenile court alleging that a minor is a person within the description of Section 602, and while the case is before the juvenile court, the statute of limitations applicable under the general law to the offense alleged to bring the minor within such description is suspended.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1616.)
-------------------------------------------

606.

When a petition has been filed in a juvenile court, the minor who is the subject of the petition shall not thereafter be subject to criminal prosecution based on the facts giving rise to the petition unless the juvenile court finds that the minor is not a fit and proper subject to be dealt with under this chapter and orders that criminal proceedings be resumed or instituted against him, or the petition is transferred to a court of criminal jurisdiction pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 707.01.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 996, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

607.

(a) The court may retain jurisdiction over a person who is found to be a ward or dependent child of the juvenile court until the ward or dependent child attains 21 years of age, except as provided in subdivisions (b), (c), (d), (e), and (f).

(b) The court may retain jurisdiction over a person who is found to be a person described in Section 602 by reason of the commission of an offense listed in subdivision (b) of Section 707, until that person attains 23 years of age, or two years from the date of commitment to a secure youth treatment facility pursuant to Section
 875, whichever occurs later, subject to the provisions of subdivision (c).

(c) The court may retain jurisdiction over a person who is found to be a person described in Section 602 by reason of the commission of an offense listed in subdivision (b) of Section 707 until that person attains 25 years of age, or two years from the date of commitment to a secure youth treatment facility pursuant to Section 875, whichever occurs later, if the person, at the time of adjudication of a crime or crimes, would, in criminal court, have faced an aggregate sentence of seven years or more.

(d) The court may retain jurisdiction over a person who is 25 years of age or older for a period not to exceed two years from the date of disposition if the person is found to be a person described in Section 602 by reason of the
 commission of an offense listed in subdivision (b) of Section 707. The court shall exercise jurisdiction in conformance with the objectives of the juvenile court.

(e) The court shall not discharge a person from its jurisdiction who has been committed to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Justice while the person remains under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Justice, including periods of extended control ordered pursuant to Section 1800.

(f) The court may retain jurisdiction over a person described in Section 602 by reason of the commission of an offense listed in subdivision (b) of Section 707, who has been confined in a state hospital or other appropriate public or private mental health facility pursuant to Section 702.3 until that person attains 25 years of age, unless the court that committed the person finds, after notice and hearing, that the person’s sanity has been restored.

(g) The court may retain jurisdiction over a person while that person is the subject of a warrant for arrest issued pursuant to Section 663.

(h) Notwithstanding subdivisions (b), (c), and (f), a person who is committed by the juvenile court to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Justice on or after July 1, 2012, but before July 1, 2018, and who is found to be a person described in Section 602 by reason of the commission of an offense listed in subdivision (b) of Section 707 shall be discharged upon the expiration of a two-year period of control, or when the person attains 23 years of age, whichever occurs later, unless an order for further detention has been made by the committing court pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 1800) of Chapter 1
 of Division 2.5. This subdivision does not apply to a person who is committed to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Justice, or to a person who is confined in a state hospital or other appropriate public or private mental health facility, by a court prior to July 1, 2012, pursuant to subdivisions (b), (c), and (f).

(i) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision
 (h), a person who is committed by the juvenile court to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Justice, on or after July 1, 2018, and who is found to be a person described in Section 602 by reason of the commission of an offense listed in subdivision (c) of Section 290.008 of the Penal Code or subdivision (b) of Section 707 of this code, shall be discharged upon the expiration of a two-year period of control, or when the person attains 23 years of age, whichever occurs later, unless an order for further detention has been made by the committing court pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 1800) of Chapter 1 of Division 2.5.

(2) A person who, at the time of adjudication of a crime or crimes, would, in criminal court, have faced an aggregate sentence of seven years or more, shall be discharged upon the expiration of a two-year period of control, or when the person
 attains 25 years of age, whichever occurs later, unless an order for further detention has been made by the committing court pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 1800) of Chapter 1 of Division 2.5.

(3) This subdivision does not apply to a person who is committed to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Justice, or to a person who is confined in a state hospital or other appropriate public or private mental health facility, by a court prior to July 1, 2018, as described in subdivision
 (h).

(j) The amendments to this section made by Chapter 342 of the Statutes of 2012 apply retroactively.

(k) This section does not change the period of the juvenile court jurisdiction
 for a person committed to the Division of Juvenile Justice prior to July 1, 2018.

(l) This section shall become operative July 1, 2021.

(m) The amendments to this section made by the act that added this subdivision apply retroactively.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 190, Sec. 12.   (SB 135)   Effective September 13, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

607.1.

(a) This section shall become operative on the 90th day after the enactment of the act adding this section.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding Section 607, the court shall retain jurisdiction as described in paragraph (2) over any person who meets both of the following criteria:(A) The person has been discharged from the physical custody of a facility of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities.

(B) The person is subject to subdivision (b) of Section 1766 or subdivision (c) of Section 1766.01.

(2) The court shall retain jurisdiction over a person who is described in
 paragraph (1) until one of the following applies:

(A) The person attains the age of 25 years.

(B) The court terminates jurisdiction pursuant to Section 778 or 779, or any other applicable law.

(C) Jurisdiction is terminated by operation of any other applicable law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 729, Sec. 10.   (AB 1628)   Effective October 19, 2010.   Section operative January 17, 2011, pursuant to subd. (a).)
-------------------------------------------

607.2.

(a) (1) On and after January 1, 2012, the court shall hold a hearing prior to terminating jurisdiction over a ward who satisfies any of the following criteria:

(A) Is a minor subject to an order for foster care placement described in Section 11402 as a ward who has not previously been subject to the jurisdiction of the court as a result of a petition filed pursuant to Section 325.

(B) Is a nonminor who was subject to an order for foster care placement described in Section 11402 as a ward on the day he or she attained 18 years of age.

(C) Is
 a ward who was subject to an order for foster care placement described in Section 11402 as a dependent of the court at the time the court adjudged the child to be a ward of the court under Section 725.

(2) The notice of hearing under this subdivision may be served electronically pursuant to Section 212.5.

(b) At a hearing during which termination of jurisdiction over a ward described in subdivision (a) is being considered, the court shall take one of the following actions:

(1) Modify its jurisdiction from delinquency jurisdiction to transition jurisdiction, if the court finds the ward is a person described in Section 450.

(2) (A) For a
 ward who was not previously subject to the jurisdiction of the court as a result of a petition filed pursuant to Section 325, order the probation department or the ward’s attorney to submit an application to the child welfare services department pursuant to Section 329 to declare the minor a dependent of the court and modify the court’s jurisdiction from delinquency jurisdiction to dependency jurisdiction, if the court finds all of the following:

(i) The ward is a minor.

(ii) The ward does not come within the description in Section 450, but jurisdiction as a ward may no longer be required.

(iii) The ward appears to come within the description of Section 300 and cannot be returned home safely.

(B) The court shall set a hearing within 20 judicial days of the date of the order described in subparagraph (A) to review the child welfare services department’s decision and may either affirm its decision not to file a petition pursuant to Section 300 or order the child welfare services department to file a petition pursuant to Section 300. The notice of hearing under this subparagraph may be served electronically pursuant to Section 212.5.

(3) Vacate the order terminating jurisdiction over the minor as a dependent of the court, resume jurisdiction pursuant to Section 300 based on the prior petition filed pursuant to Section 325, and terminate the court’s jurisdiction over the minor as a ward, if the minor was subject to an order for foster care placement described in Section
 11402 as a dependent of the court at the time the court adjudged the minor to be a ward and assumed jurisdiction over the minor under Section 725.

(4) Continue its delinquency jurisdiction over a ward pursuant to Section 303 as a nonminor dependent, as defined in subdivision (v) of Section 11400, who is eligible to remain in foster care pursuant to Section 11403, if the ward is a nonminor and the court did not modify its jurisdiction as described in Section 450, unless the court finds that after reasonable and documented efforts, the ward cannot be located or does not wish to become a nonminor dependent. In making this finding and prior to entering an order terminating its delinquency jurisdiction, the court shall ensure that the ward has had an opportunity to confer with his or her counsel and has been informed of his or her options,
 including the right to reenter foster care placement by completing a voluntary reentry agreement as described in subdivision (z) of Section 11400 and to file a petition pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 388 for the court to assume or resume transition jurisdiction over him or her pursuant to Section 450. The fact that a ward declines to be a nonminor dependent does not restrict the authority of the court to maintain delinquency jurisdiction pursuant to Section 607.

(5) Continue its delinquency jurisdiction.

(6) Terminate its delinquency jurisdiction if the ward does not come within the provisions of paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive.

(c) If the court modifies jurisdiction, its order shall comply with the requirements
 of subdivision (f) of Section 241.1.

(d) This section shall not be construed as changing the requirements of Section 727.2 or 727.3 with respect to reunification of minors with their families or the establishment of an alternative permanent plan for minors for whom reunification is not pursued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 136.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

607.3.

On and after January 1, 2012, at the hearing required under Section 607.2 for a ward who is 18 years of age or older and subject to an order for foster care placement as described in Section 11402, the probation department shall complete all of the following actions:

(a) Ensure that the nonminor has been informed of his or her options, including the right to reenter foster care placement by completing a voluntary reentry agreement as described in subdivision (z) of Section 11400 and the right to file a petition pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 388 for the court to resume transition jurisdiction pursuant to Section 450.

(b) Ensure that the ward has had an
 opportunity to confer with his or her counsel.

(c) Ensure that the ward is present in court for the hearing, unless the ward has waived his or her right to appear in court and elects to appear by a telephone instead, or document the efforts it made to locate the ward when the ward is not available to appear at the hearing.

(d) Submit a report to the court describing all of the following:

(1) Whether it is in the ward’s best interest for a court to assume or continue transition jurisdiction over the ward as a nonminor dependent pursuant to Section 450.

(2) Whether the ward has indicated that he or she does not want juvenile court jurisdiction to continue.

(3) Whether the ward has been
 informed of his or her right to reenter foster care by completing the voluntary reentry agreement as described in subdivision (z) of Section 11400.

(e) Submit to the court the completed 90-day transition plan.

(f) Submit to the court written verification that the information, documents, and services set forth in paragraphs (1) to (8), inclusive, of subdivision (e) of Section 391 have been provided to the ward.

(g) Submit to the court written verification that the requirements set forth in Section 607.5 have been completed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 459, Sec. 16.   (AB 212)   Effective October 4, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

607.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, whenever the juvenile court terminates jurisdiction over a ward who has also been designated a dependent of the court, or upon release of a ward from a facility that is not a foster care facility, a probation officer or parole officer shall provide the person with, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) A written notice stating that the person is a former foster child and may be eligible for the services and benefits that are available to a former foster child through public and private programs, including, but not limited to, any independent living program for former foster children. Providing the proof of dependency and wardship document described in
 All-County Letter 07-33 and Section 31-525.6 of Chapter 31-500 of Division 31 of the State Department of Social Services Manual of Policies and Procedures, as it existed on January 1, 2010, shall satisfy this requirement.

(2) Existing information described in Section 31-525.61 of Chapter 31-500 of Division 31 of the State Department of Social Services Manual of Policies and Procedures, as it existed on January 1, 2010, that informs the person of the availability of assistance to enable the person to apply for, and gain acceptance into, federal and state programs that provide benefits to former foster children, including, but not limited to, financial assistance, housing, and educational resources for which he or she may be eligible.

(3) Existing information described in Section 31-525.61 of Chapter 31-500 of Division 31 of the State Department of Social Services Manual of Policies
 and Procedures, as it existed on January 1, 2010, that informs the person of the availability of assistance to enable the person to apply for, and gain acceptance into, federal and state programs that provide independent living services to youth 16 years of age and over who may be eligible for services.

(b) This section shall apply to any ward who was previously adjudged a dependent child of the court pursuant to Section 300 or a child who at any time has been placed in foster care pursuant to Section 727.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to alter or amend the obligations of probation officers under current law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 631, Sec. 2.   (SB 945)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

608.

In any case in which a person is alleged to be a person described in Section 601 or 602, or subdivision (a) of Section 604, and the age of the person is at issue and the court finds that a scientific or medical test would be of assistance in determining the age of the person, the court may consider ordering an examination of the minor using the method described in “The Permanent Mandibular Third Molar” from the Journal of Forensic Odonto-Stomatology, Vol. 1: No. 1: January–June 1983.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 749, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 15. Wards—Temporary Custody and Detention [625. - 641.]

625.

A peace officer may, without a warrant, take into temporary custody a minor:

(a) Who is under the age of 18 years when such officer has reasonable cause for believing that such minor is a person described in Section 601 or 602, or

(b) Who is a ward of the juvenile court or concerning whom an order has been made under Section 636 or 702, when such officer has reasonable cause for believing that person has violated an order of the juvenile court or has escaped from any commitment ordered by the juvenile court, or

(c) Who is under the age of 18 years and who is found in any street or public place suffering from any sickness or injury which requires care, medical treatment, hospitalization, or other remedial care.

In any case where a minor is taken into temporary custody on the ground that there is reasonable cause for believing that such minor is a person described in Section 601 or 602, or that he has violated an order of the juvenile court or escaped from any commitment ordered by the juvenile court, the officer shall advise such minor that anything he says can be used against him and shall advise him of his constitutional rights, including his right to remain silent, his right to have counsel present during any interrogation, and his right to have counsel appointed if he is unable to afford counsel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------

625.1.

Any minor who is taken into temporary custody pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 625, when the peace officer has reasonable cause for believing the minor is a person described in Section 602, or pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 625, may be requested to submit to voluntary chemical testing of his or her urine for the purpose of determining the presence of alcohol or illegal drugs. The peace officer shall inform the minor that the chemical test is voluntary. The results of this test may be considered by the court in determining the disposition of the minor pursuant to Section 706 or 777. Unless otherwise provided by law, the results of such a test shall not be the basis of a petition filed by the prosecuting attorney to declare the minor a person described in Section 602, nor shall it be the basis for such a finding by a court pursuant to Section 702.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1117, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

625.2.

(a) Before administering the chemical test pursuant to Section 625.1, the peace officer shall give the following admonition: “I am asking you to take a voluntary urine test to test for the presence of drugs or alcohol in your body. You have the right to refuse to take this test. If you do take the test, it cannot be used as the basis for filing any additional charges against you. It can be used by a court for the purpose of sentencing. You have the right to telephone your parent or guardian before you decide whether or not to take this test.”

(b) The admonition in subdivision (a) shall not be given when a chemical test is administered pursuant to Section 23612 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 294.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

625.3.

Notwithstanding Section 625, a minor who is 14 years of age or older and who is taken into custody by a peace officer for the personal use of a firearm in the commission or attempted commission of a felony or any offense listed in subdivision (b) of Section 707 shall not be released until that minor is brought before a judicial officer.

(History: Amended March 7, 2000, by initiative Proposition 21, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

625.4.

(a) A law enforcement officer, employee of a law enforcement agency, or any agent thereof, shall not request that a voluntary DNA reference sample be collected directly from the person of a minor unless all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The minor consents in writing, after being verbally informed of the purpose and manner of the collection, the right to refuse consent, the right to sample expungement, and the right to consult with an attorney, parent, or legal guardian prior to providing consent.

(2) A specific parent or legal guardian identified by the minor, or an attorney representing the minor, is contacted, is provided the information specified in paragraph (1), is allowed to privately consult by telephone or in person with the minor, and, after that consultation, concurs with the minor’s decision to consent.

(3) Local law enforcement provides the minor with a form for requesting expungement of the voluntary DNA buccal swab sample, if a sample is consented to and collected pursuant to this section.

(b) Nothing in subdivision (a) is intended to create a right to the appointment of counsel.
